DI-493
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIATO-01

DTC B0112/41 Short in Side Squib RH Circuit
(to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The side squib RH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the side airbag assembly RH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.

DTC B0112/41 is recorded when ground short is detected in the side squib RH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Shortin side squib RH circuit (to ground) « Side airbag assembly RH (Side squib RH)
B0112/41 « Side squib RH malfunction * Airbag sensor assembly
* Airbag sensorassembly malfunction * Floor No. 2wire
HINT:

DTC B0112/41 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-486.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check floor No. 2 wire (side squib RH circuit).

CHECK:
Floor No. 2 Wire Measure the resistance between the body ground and SFR+ of
]Airbag the floor No. 2 wire connector on the side airbag assembly RH
Side Squib RH Sensor (side squib RH) side.
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Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©

Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Using a service wire, connect SFR+ and SFR- of the floor
No. 2 wire connector on the side airbag assembly RH
(side squib RH) side.

Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@)

HINT:

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCBO 112/41 is notoutput.

Codes other than code B0112/41 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

e )

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 | Check side squib RH.
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PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the side airbag assembly RH (side squib RH)
connector.

Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@)

HINT:

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCBO0 112/41 isnotoutput.

Codes other than code B0112/41 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace side airbag assembly RH

(side squib RH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP

(RM970E)



